Hawaii statutes.
§634-30 Organizations and associations,
service of process on; judgment. When two or more persons associate and
act, whether for profit or not, under a common name, including associating and acting
as a labor organization or employer organization, whether the common name
comprises the names of the persons or not, they may sue in or be sued by the
common name, and the process shall be served on any officer, trustee, or agent
of the association if an officer, trustee, or agent can be found, or if no officer,
trustee, or agent can be found as shown by the return of the serving officer,
then upon any one or more members of the association, or as otherwise provided
by rule of court. Any such service constitutes service upon the association.
The judgment in those cases shall accrue to the joint or common benefit of and
bind the joint or common property of the association, the same as though all
members had been named as parties to the action. No judgment shall be
enforceable against any person or the person's individual assets unless the:

(1) Person has been joined and served as an
individual party to the action; or

(2) Judgment is so enforceable pursuant to section
634-3 or any other law. [L Sp 1949, c 4, §1; RL 1955, §230-39; HRS §634-66; am
L 1972, c 89, §2A(j); ren HRS §634-30; am L 2016, c 55, §27]

Rules of Court

Actions relating to unincorporated associations, see HRCP
rule 23.2.

Execution, see HRCP rule 69.

Service, see HRCP rule 4.

Case Notes

Mentioned with respect to validity of personal judgment
against creditors and stockholders of a corporation. 59 H. 189, 579 P.2d 99
(1978).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next